Washington statutes.
RCW 39.112.080

Use of tax revenue for bond repayment.

A city that issues bonds issued under RCW 39.112.070 to finance public improvements may pledge for the payment of such bonds all or part of any regular property tax revenues derived from the public improvements.

[ 2016 c 192 s 8.]